Washington statutes.
RCW 43.23.002

Director—Appointment—Powers and duties—Salary.

The executive and administrative head of the department of agriculture shall be the director. The director shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate and shall have complete charge of and supervisory power over the department. The director shall be paid a salary fixed by the governor in accordance with RCW 43.03.040.

[ 1983 c 248 s 1.]